Missouri, session 2026, SB1171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 571.400 and 571.401,
to read as follows:
571.400. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Secure gun storage", a safe, gun safe, gun case,
lock box, or other device that is designed to be or can be
used to store a firearm and that is designed to be unlocked
only by means of a key, a combination, or other similar
means;
(2) "Unauthorized person", a person who is prohibited
from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.
2. A person commits the offense of community
endangerment due to unsafe storage of a firearm in the first
degree if a person stores or leaves a firearm in a location
where the person knows or reasonably should know that an
unauthorized person may gain access to the firearm and such
unauthorized person causes personal injury or death with the
firearm.

SB 1171 2
3. The offense of community endangerment due to unsafe
storage of a firearm in the first degree is a class C felony.
4. It shall not be a violation of this section if:
(1) The firearm is stored in a secure gun storage, or
other secured storage with a trigger lock or similar device
that is designed to prevent the unauthorized use or
discharge of the firearm;
(2) The unauthorized person is a minor who has the
permission of a parent or guardian to possess the firearm
and is supervised by a person eighteen years of age or older;
(3) The unauthorized person obtains or discharges the
firearm in a lawful act of self-defense pursuant to chapter
563; or
(4) The unauthorized person obtained the firearm as a
result of an unlawful entry and such unlawful entry is
reported to a law enforcement agency within five days of the
time he or she knew or reasonably should have known that the
firearm had been taken.
571.401. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Secure gun storage", a safe, gun safe, gun case,
lock box, or other device that is designed to be or can be
used to store a firearm and that is designed to be unlocked
only by means of a key, a combination, or other similar
means;
(2) "Unauthorized person", a person who is prohibited
from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.
2. A person commits the offense of community
endangerment due to unsafe storage of a firearm in the
second degree if a person stores or leaves a firearm in a
location where the person knows or reasonably should know

SB 1171 3
that an unauthorized person may gain access to the firearm
and such unauthorized person:
(1) Causes the firearm to discharge;
(2) Carries, exhibits, or displays the firearm in a
public place in a manner that is intended to intimidate
another or that warrants alarm for the safety of other
persons; or
(3) Uses the firearm in the commission of a crime.
3. The offense of community endangerment due to unsafe
storage of a firearm in the second degree is a class D
felony.
4. It shall not be a violation of this section if:
(1) The firearm is stored in a secure gun storage, or
other secured storage with a trigger lock or similar device
that is designed to prevent the unauthorized use or
discharge of the firearm;
(2) The unauthorized person is a minor who has the
permission of a parent or guardian to possess the firearm
and is supervised by a person eighteen years of age or older;
(3) The unauthorized person obtains or discharges the
firearm in a lawful act of self-defense pursuant to chapter
563; or
(4) The unauthorized person obtains the firearm as a
result of an unlawful entry and such unlawful entry is
reported to a law enforcement agency within five days of the
time he or she knew or reasonably should have known that the
firearm had been taken.
✓